Missouri, session 2026, HB2824.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 197.137, to read as follows:
197.137. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Emergency contraception", any drug or device approved by the Food and
Drug Administration that prevents pregnancy after sexual intercourse;
(2) "Sexual assault", the same meaning given to the term in section 455.010.
2. Each hospital licensed under this chapter shall offer emergency contraception
to any woman who presents herself for care at the hospital and reports to the hospital
that a sexual assault was committed against her within the previous five days.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.